Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2590.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; university of Arizona; agricultural efficiency and water optimization project; Arizona department of agriculture; report; exemption A. The sum of $2,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the university of Arizona to conduct a study by the college of agriculture, life and environmental sciences for an agricultural efficiency and water resource optimization project. The project shall prioritize the following: 1. Identification of innovative practices that reduce water consumption and improve soil health to enhance the sustainability of agriculture in desert areas. 2. Support for the development of and training needed for a skilled workforce in agricultural research, conservation and policy. 3. Opportunities to develop partnerships with indigenous scholars and tribal communities to integrate traditional knowledge with scientific research for holistic agricultural development. 4. Best practices to disseminate any research findings to the public and to relevant governmental bodies to inform policy decisions and to promote sustainable agricultural practices. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section may be used to conduct data mapping activities required for the project, including: 1. Conducting surveys and interviews with agricultural stakeholders to identify key challenges and opportunities in farming operations. 2. Performing market analysis to determine the economic impact of improved agricultural practices and technologies. 3. Deploying and using advanced technology capabilities, such as aerial drones, satellites and aircraft, to collect data on soil health and water resource usage. 4. Developing and implementing strategies to optimize water use and improve soil health that must include applications that will enhance water absorption, lower water use rates and provide for better usage of farmlands in this state. C. The university of Arizona shall contract and collaborate with third-party entities to conduct any necessary data mapping activities. D. On or before January 1, 2028, the Arizona department of agriculture and the university of Arizona college of agriculture, life and environmental sciences shall submit a report to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and shall submit a copy of this report to the secretary of state summarizing the progress and outcomes of the project, including any recommendations for future actions. E. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.